Hawaii statutes.
§661-23 Evidentiary determination; burden
of proof. A determination that a person has violated the provisions of
this part shall be based on a preponderance of the evidence. [L 2000, c 126, pt
of §1; am L 2001, c 55, §28(2)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next